Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 1. General Provisions

§ 33-7-101.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Barbering” means the practice upon any person or persons of any of the following acts (when done for cosmetic purposes, and not for the treatment of disease or physical or mental ailments, and when done for payment, either directly or indirectly, or without payment except for the immediate family); provided, any person or persons operating a beauty salon or practicing cosmetology and its related fields exclusively shall be exempt from the provisions of this act: shaving or treating the beard or cutting the hair, singeing, shampooing or dyeing the hair, permanent waving or applying hair tonics, massaging, applying cosmetic preparations, antiseptics, powder, oil, clay or lotions, to the scalp, face or neck;

“Board” means the state board of barber examiners;

“School of barbering” means a place licensed under this act where barbering is taught to students;

“Student” means a person duly enrolled and regularly attending a licensed school of barbering for the purpose of receiving instruction on and learning the practices of barbering;

“Unprofessional” means acting in an extreme manner not conforming to current standards of the barbering industry;

“Instructor” means a person licensed to teach barbering or any practices thereof in a school of barbering as defined by this act and rules of the board;

“This act” means W.S.

33-7-101

through

33-7-211

.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 67, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 11-102; C.S. 1945, § 37-402; W.S. 1957, § 33-77; Laws 1967, ch. 57, § 1; 2005, ch. 42, § 1; 2015 ch. 26, § 1, effective February 25, 2015.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, redesignated former (a) as (a)(ii), former (b) as (a)(iii), and former (c) as (a)(i); added (a)(iv) through (a)(vi); and made stylistic changes.

The 2015 amendment,

added present (a)(vi) and redesignated former (a)(vi) as (a)(vii).

Laws 2015, ch. 26, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

Editor's note. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 33-7-102.
State board of barber examiners; created; designation; composition; appointment, qualifications and term of members.

There is created the “state board of barber examiners”, which shall consist of three (3) persons, each of whom shall be a resident citizen of the state of Wyoming and the holder of a valid registration certificate as a registered barber which has been annually renewed for the period of not less than five (5) years immediately preceding the date of his appointment and shall not be either directly or indirectly connected with any barber school or college. The members of the board shall be appointed by the governor. The governor may remove any member of the board as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

. The term of office for each member appointed hereafter shall be three (3) years. Each term shall terminate on March 1 of the last calendar year of that term.

Effective July 1, 1979, appointments and terms shall be in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

through

28-12-103

.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 67, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 11-101; C.S. 1945, § 37-401; W.S. 1957, § 33-78; Laws 1961, ch. 193, § 1; 1963, ch. 15, § 1; 1967, ch. 57, § 2; 1979, ch. 17, § 2; 1987, ch. 175, § 1.

§ 33-7-103.
State board of barber examiners; election of officers; duties of secretary-treasurer; disposition of money received.

The board shall elect a president, vice-president and a secretary-treasurer at the first annual meeting from its members. The secretary-treasurer shall keep the books, temporary funds and records of the board.

Each fee required shall be paid in advance and shall be received and collected as provided by law. The board shall remit all fees and money received to the state treasurer. The state treasurer shall place the money in a separate account. The money so received and placed in the account may be used by the members of the board in defraying their actual expenses and per diem allowance as hereinafter provided in carrying out the provisions of this act.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 67, § 17; R.S. 1931, § 11-117; Laws 1935, ch. 6, § 1; 1937, ch. 67, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 37-417; Laws 1957, ch. 239, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-79; Laws 1971, ch. 27, § 11; 1973, ch. 215, § 1; ch. 245, § 3; 2005, ch. 42, § 1; 2014 ch. 69, § 2, effective July 1, 2014; 2015 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (b), substituted “Each fee required shall be paid in advance and” for “All money,” substituted “a separate account” for “an account within the earmarked revenue fund,” deleted provisions at the end of the second sentence as to how payment would be made, and deleted the former last sentence requiring the secretary-treasurer to perform specified duties.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in (b), deleted “two percent (2%) of” and “in the general fund and the remainder” in the second sentence.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (b), inserted the second sentence.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-7-101(a)(vi)

§ 33-7-104.
State board of barber examiners; powers and duties; compensation.

The board shall furnish suitable quarters and adopt and use a common seal for the authentication of its orders and records. To assist in implementing this act, the board may employ personnel as it deems necessary and fix their duties and remuneration. Each member of the board shall receive as salary the sum paid each day to legislators, or an equivalent hourly wage, together with per diem and mileage as provided in W.S. 33-1-302(a)(vii). The entire costs and expenses of carrying out this act shall be paid only out of the fees collected in the administration of this act.

History:

Laws 1931, ch. 67, § 18; R.S. 1931, § 11-118; C.S. 1945, § 37-418; W.S. 1957, § 33-80; Laws 1961, ch. 193, § 2; 1973, ch. 179, § 1; ch. 215, § 1; 1985, ch. 136, § 1; 1993, ch. 139, § 1; 2014 ch. 69, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

Cross references. —

As to meal, lodging and travel expenses, see §

9-3-102

.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, substituted “as provided in W.S. 33-1-302(a)(vii)” for “allowance as allowed to state employees, when actually engaged in board activities” in the third sentence.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The term “this act” referred to in this section, probably refers to Laws 1931, ch. 67, § 2 (§§

33-7-101

through

33-7-211

).

§ 33-7-105.
State board of barber examiners; meetings.

One (1) annual meeting shall be held at a time and place designated by the president of the board. Other meetings shall be held as called by the president of the board, or by the president upon the written request of two (2) members of the board.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 67, § 20; R.S. 1931, § 11-120; C.S. 1945, § 37-420; W.S. 1957, § 33-81; Laws 1985, ch. 136, § 1.

§ 33-7-106.
State board of barber examiners; to furnish printed matter.

All certificates of registration, permits, licenses or other printed matter necessary to carry out the provisions of this act shall be provided and issued by the board, and at no expense to the state.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 67, § 22; R.S. 1931, § 11-122; C.S. 1945, § 37-422; W.S. 1957, § 33-82.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-7-101(a)(vi).

§ 33-7-107.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 136, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1931, ch. 67, § 4, related to apprentices.

§ 33-7-108.
Shop license; barber school license; fee; renewal; application; inspection fees; nontransferable.

No person, association, partnership or corporation shall operate or conduct a barbershop or barber school without a valid, unexpired license. Licenses shall be issued by the secretary of the board of barber examiners or the board’s designee. The annual license fee shall be set by the board pursuant to W.S.

33-1-201

for each shop or school, payable in advance, but if not paid on or before July 31 of each year, a late fee set by board rule and regulation shall be assessed. The licenses shall be conspicuously displayed at all times, and no license shall be issued until all sanitary regulations required by W.S.

33-7-101

through

33-7-211

or prescribed by the board have been complied with. Applications for new shops or schools or for shops or schools changing locations shall be made in writing on forms furnished by the board, and shall contain information required by the board. An inspection fee for a new shop or school or for a shop or school changing location shall be set by the board pursuant to W.S.

33-1-201

. A shop or school license is not transferable.

Registered barbers, cosmetologists, manicurists or nail technicians, estheticians and hair stylists licensed under W.S.

33-12-119

through

33-12-140

may engage in the practice for which they are licensed in the same shop if the shop is licensed under subsection (a) of this section and under W.S.

33-12-119

through

33-12-140

.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 67, § 14; R.S. 1931, § 11-114; Laws 1935, ch. 8, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 37-414; W.S. 1957, § 36-84; Laws 1961, ch. 193, § 3; 1973, ch. 202, § 1; 1985, ch. 136, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 1993, ch. 131, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2005, ch. 42, § 1; ch. 98, § 1.

Cross references. —

See §

33-7-201

as to certificate of registration.

See §

33-7-111

as to sanitary requirements.

The 2004 amendment,

in (b), substituted “W.S.

33-12-119

through

33-12-140

” for “W.S.

33-12-101

through 33-12-118” twice.

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by ch. 42, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, in (a), inserted “association, partnership or corporation” after “No person”, inserted “or barber school” after “barbershop,” inserted “the board's designee” after “board of barber examiners,” substituted “late fee” for “renewal fee,” and inserted “or barber school” or “or school” after “shop” multiple times; in (b), inserted “manicurists or nail technicians, estheticians and hair stylists” after “cosmetologists”; and made stylistic changes.

The second 2005 amendment, by ch. 98, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, in (b) inserted “manicurists or nail technicians, estheticians and hair stylists.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction and effect of statute regulating beauty culture schools, 56 ALR2d 879.

§ 33-7-109.
Persons addicted to intoxicating liquors or narcotics.

No person addicted to the use of intoxicating liquors or drugs to an extent to render him unfit to practice or teach barbering shall be entitled to any license, nor shall any such person work or be employed in any barbershop.

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 42, § 2.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 67, § 15; R.S. 1931, § 11-115; C.S. 1945, § 37-415; W.S. 1957, § 33-85; 1997, ch. 128, § 2; 2005, ch. 42, §§ 1, 2.

Cross references. —

As to alcoholic beverages generally, see title 12.

For the Controlled Substances Act, see §§

35-7-1001

through

35-7-1057

.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), deleted language restricting persons with communicable diseases from practicing or being serviced, substituted “drugs to the extent to render him unfit to practice or to teach barbering” for “morphine, cocaine, or other narcotics”; and repealed former (b), providing procedural guidelines where a person's license has been restricted.

§ 33-7-110.
Sanitary inspection.

The board of barber examiners shall make a sanitary inspection of each barbershop and school at least annually.

Barbershops in the state of Wyoming shall be open to such county health officers, members of the board, its inspectors or representatives at any time during business hours.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 67, § 16; R.S. 1931, § 11-116; C.S. 1945, § 37-416; W.S. 1957, § 33-86; Laws 1985, ch. 136, § 1; 2005, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), inserted “and school” after “barbershop,” and substituted “annually” for “once every six (6) months.”

§ 33-7-111.
Sanitary requirements; rules.

and (b) Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 42, § 2.

The board may promulgate rules regarding the operation of barbershops and schools to prevent the spread of infectious and contagious diseases.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 67, § 19; R.S. 1931, § 11-119; C.S. 1945, § 37-419; W.S. 1957, § 33-87; Laws 1985, ch. 136, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 2005, ch. 42, §§ 1, 2.

Cross references. —

As to compliance with sanitary regulations as a prerequisite to obtaining license, see §

33-7-108

.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote the section, repealing former (a) and (b), which provided specific cleaning, ventilation, water, inspection and related health requirements, and in (c), deleting the requirement that the board make rules in consultation with the department of public health.

§ 33-7-112.
Penalty.

Any violation of this act constitutes a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) nor more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisonment for not more than ninety (90) days, or both.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 67, § 23; R.S. 1931, § 11-123; C.S. 1945, § 37-423; W.S. 1957, § 33-88; Laws 1961, ch. 193, § 4; 1985, ch. 136, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-7-101(a)(vi).